California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Sixty percent of the total funds available for grants pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.620 shall be allocated to cities and to districts other than a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district. Each city’s and district’s allocation shall be in the same ratio as the city’s or district’s population is to the combined total of the state’s population that is included in incorporated areas and unincorporated areas within the district, except that each city or district shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000). In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of such a district, the population in the area of overlapping jurisdiction shall be attributed to each jurisdiction in proportion to the extent to which each operate and manage parks and recreational areas and facilities for that population. In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of such a district, and in the area of overlap the city does not operate and manage parks and recreational areas and facilities, all grant funds shall be allocated to the district.

(b) Each city and each district subject to subdivision (a) whose boundaries overlap shall develop a specific plan for allocating the grant funds in accordance with the formula specified in subdivision (a). If, by April 1, 2003, the plan has not been agreed to by the city and district and submitted to the department, the director shall determine the allocation of the grant funds among the affected jurisdictions.

(c) Forty percent of the total funds available for grants pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.620 shall be allocated to counties and regional park districts, regional park and open-space districts, or regional open-space districts formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3.

(d) Each county’s allocation under subdivision (a) shall be in the same ratio as the county’s population, except that each county shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000).

(e) In any county that embraces all or part of the territory of a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district, whose board of directors is not the county board of supervisors, the amount allocated to the county shall be apportioned between that district and the county in proportion to the population of the county that is included within the territory of the district and the population of the county that is outside the territory of the district.

(f) For the purpose of making the calculations required by this section, population shall be determined by the department, in cooperation with the Department of Finance, on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data and other verifiable population data that the department may require to be furnished by the applicant city, county, or district.

(g) Of the funds appropriated in subdivision (c) of Section 5096.620, twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) shall be allocated to a city with an urban population greater than three million five hundred thousand in a county of the first class, and ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated to a county of the first class.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares that it intends all recipients of funds pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.620 to use those funds to supplement local revenues, in existence on the effective date of the act adding this chapter during the 2001–02 Regular Session, that are being used for parks or other projects eligible for funds under this chapter. To receive any allocation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.620, the recipient may not reduce the amount of funding otherwise available to be spent on parks or other projects eligible for funds under this chapter in their jurisdiction. One-time allocations that have been expended for parks or other projects, but which are not available on an ongoing basis, may not be considered when calculating a recipient’s annual expenditures. For purposes of this subdivision, the Controller may request fiscal data from recipients for the preceding three fiscal years. Each recipient shall furnish the data to the Controller not later than 120 days after receiving the request from the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.624.

(a) The director shall prepare and adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating applications for grants allocated pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 5096.620. Individual applications for funds shall be submitted to the department for approval as to their conformity with the requirements of this chapter. The application shall be accompanied by certification that the project for which the grant is requested is consistent with the park and recreation element of the applicable city or county general plan or the district park and recreation plan, as the case may be, and will satisfy a high priority need.

(b) To utilize available grant funds as effectively as possible, overlapping or adjoining jurisdictions and applicants with similar objectives are encouraged to combine projects and submit a joint application. An applicant may allocate all or a portion of its per capita share for a regional or state project.

(c) The director shall annually forward a statement of the total amount to be appropriated in each fiscal year for projects approved for grants pursuant to this article to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill. A list of eligible jurisdictions and the amount of grant funds to be allocated to each shall also be made available by the department.

(d) Funds appropriated pursuant to this article shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years from the date the appropriation is effective. Regardless of the date of encumbrance of the granted funds, the recipient is expected to complete all funded projects within eight years of the effective date of the appropriation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.625.

The funds provided in subdivision (d) of Section 5096.620 shall be available as grants for public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the acquisition and development of new parks, botanical gardens, nature centers, and other community facilities in park poor communities. The funds may be expended pursuant to Section 5004.5, and Chapter 1.55 (commencing with Section 5095), if Senate Bill 359 of the 2001–02 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted on or before January 1, 2003, and Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 5640), if Assembly Bill 1481 of the 2001–02 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted on or before January 1, 2003, or pursuant to any other applicable statutory authorization. Not less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) of the funds provided in subdivision (d) of Section 5096.620 shall be expended for competitive grants consistent with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 5096.348. Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of the funds provided in subdivision (d) of Section 5096.620 shall be available for development of Central Park in the City of Rancho Cucamonga. Five million dollars ($5,000,000) of the funds provided in subdivision (d) of Section 5096.620 shall be available for allocation to the City of Los Angeles for park and recreation or community facilities at or adjacent to the Hansen Dam recreation area. Five million dollars ($5,000,000) of the funds provided in subdivision (d) of Section 5096.620 shall be available for allocation to the City of Los Angeles for the Sepulveda Basin recreational parkland.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.629.

In making grants of funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5096.620, priority shall be assigned to projects that include a commitment for a matching contribution. Contributions may be in the form of money from a nonstate source; gifts of real property, equipment, and consumable supplies; volunteer services; free or reduced-cost use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.633.

Any grant funds appropriated pursuant to this article that have not been expended by the grant recipient prior to July 1, 2011, shall revert to the fund and be available for appropriation by the Legislature for one or more of the local assistance programs specified in Section 5096.620 that the Legislature determines to be the highest priority statewide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.634.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “City” means the City of Laguna Woods.

(2) “City Centre Park property” means the approximately 0.32 acre portion of City Centre Park to be removed from public recreation use by the City of Laguna Woods and used as a fire station and for public safety purposes pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the removal of park property and the reinvestment of funding for capital improvements in
 the City Centre Park authorized under this section is for the sole purposes of enhancing recreational opportunities and improving public safety in the city, and not to facilitate industrial development.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, no later than January 1, 2026, the city may remove from public recreation use City Centre Park property improved with grant moneys from this chapter, subject to the reinvestment of two hundred twelve thousand dollars ($212,000) in capital improvements as described in subdivision (d) in the remaining City Centre Park, which shall be used for park purposes, subject to all applicable requirements of the grant funding received under this chapter, and at no cost to the state. The two-hundred-twelve-­thousand-dollar ($212,000) reinvestment was calculated by an independent appraisal of the fair market value of the City Centre Park property conducted in 2022 and submitted by the city to the department in 2023. 

(d) The city shall develop a plan for capital improvements to be made to the remaining City Centre Park that meets the following requirements:

(1) The plan shall include capital improvements in the amount of two hundred twelve thousand dollars ($212,000) in the remaining City Centre Park.

(2) The city shall conduct two community meetings to solicit the input of residents of the city for the capital improvements to be made.

(3) The plan shall be approved by the city council of the city and submitted to the department on or before January 1, 2025.

(4) The plan shall enhance the active or passive recreational utility to the public of the remaining City Centre Park.

(e) The plan developed pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be approved by the department before any of the capital improvements identified in the plan are made to the remaining City Centre Park.

(f) The city shall complete the capital improvements identified in the plan developed pursuant to subdivision (d) within three years of the department’s approval of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 287, Sec. 2.   (SB 475)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Land, Air, and Water Conservation [5096.650. - 5096.651.]

5096.650.

The one billion two hundred seventy-five million dollars ($1,275,000,000) allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5096.610 shall be available for the acquisition and development of land, air, and water resources in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) is continuously appropriated to the Wildlife Conservation Board for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, and protection of habitat that promotes the recovery of threatened and endangered species, that provides corridors linking separate habitat areas to prevent habitat fragmentation, and that protects
 significant natural landscapes and ecosystems such as old growth redwoods and oak woodlands and other significant habitat areas; and for grants and related state administrative costs pursuant to the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code). Funds scheduled in this subdivision may be used to prepare management plans for properties acquired in fee by the Wildlife Conservation Board.

(b) The sum of four hundred forty-five million dollars ($445,000,000) to the conservancies in accordance with the particular provisions of the statute creating each conservancy for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, and protection of land and water resources; for grants and state administrative costs; and in accordance with the following schedule:(1)To the State Coastal Conservancy $200,000,000(2)To the California Tahoe Conservancy $ 40,000,000(3)To the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy $ 40,000,000(4)To the Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy $ 20,000,000(5)To the San Joaquin River Conservancy $ 25,000,000(6)To the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Riversand Mountains Conservancy $ 40,000,000(7)To the Baldwin Hills Conservancy $ 40,000,000(8)To the San Francisco Bay Area ConservancyProgram $ 40,000,000(c) The sum of three hundred seventy-five million dollars ($375,000,000) shall be available for grants to public
 agencies and nonprofit organizations for acquisition, development, restoration, and associated planning, permitting, and administrative costs for the protection and restoration of water resources in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The sum of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) to the secretary for the acquisition and development of river parkways and for protecting urban streams. The secretary shall make funds available in accordance with Sections 7048 and 78682.2 of the Water Code, and pursuant to any other applicable statutory authorization. Not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available for grants for the urban streams program, pursuant to Section 7048 of the Water Code.

(2) The sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be available for the purposes of clean beaches, watershed protection, and water quality projects to
 protect beaches, coastal waters, rivers, lakes, and streams from contaminants, pollution, and other environmental threats.

(d) (1) The sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to the State Air Resources Board for grants to air districts pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 44275) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code for projects that reduce air pollution that affects air quality in state and local park and recreation areas. Eligible projects shall meet the requirements of Section 16727 of the Government Code and shall be consistent with Section 43023.5 of the Health and Safety Code, if Assembly Bill 1390 of the 2001–02 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted on or before January 1, 2003. Each air district shall be eligible for grants of not less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). Not more than 5 percent of the funds allocated to an air district may be used to cover the costs
 associated with implementing the grant program.

(2) Allocations of funds pursuant to this subdivision to the Lower-Emission School Bus Program shall be prioritized to retrofit or replace the most polluting schoolbuses in small air districts first and then to medium air districts as defined by the State Air Resources Board. Each allocation for this purpose shall provide enough funding for at least one project to be implemented pursuant to the Lower-Emission School Bus Program adopted by the State Air Resources Board. If a local air district has unspent funds within six months of the expenditure deadline, the air district shall work with the State Air Resources Board to transfer funds to an alternative air district with existing demand.

(e) The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to the California Conservation Corps for the acquisition, development, restoration, and
 rehabilitation of land and water resources, and for grants and state administrative costs in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available for resource conservation activities.

(2) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available for grants to local conservation corps for acquisition and development of facilities to support local conservation corps programs.

(f) The sum of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be available for grants for the preservation of agricultural lands and grazing lands, including oak woodlands and grasslands.

(g) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for grants for urban forestry
 programs pursuant to the California Urban Forestry Act of 1978 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4799.06) of Part 2.5 of Division 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 15.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, and approved in Prop. 40 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.651.

In making grants pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 5096.650, priority shall be given to projects that include a commitment for a matching contribution. Contributions may be in the form of money, property, or services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Historical and Cultural Resources Preservation [5096.652. - 5096.652.]

5096.652.

(a) The two hundred sixty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($267,500,000) allocated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5096.610 shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature for the acquisition, development, preservation, and interpretation of buildings, structures, sites, places, and artifacts that preserve and demonstrate culturally significant aspects of California’s history and for grants for these purposes. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, those which preserve and demonstrate the following:

(1) Culturally significant aspects of life during various periods of California history including architecture, economic activities, art, recreation, and transportation.

(2) Unique identifiable ethnic and other communities that have added significant elements to California’s culture.

(3) California industrial, commercial, and military history including the industries, technologies, and commercial activities that have characterized California’s economic expansion and California’s contribution to national defense.

(4) Important paleontologic, oceanographic, and geologic sites and specimens.

(b) Thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) of the funds available pursuant to this section shall be allocated to a city for the development, rehabilitation, preservation, restoration, and interpretation of resources at a city park of historical and cultural significance that is over 1,000 acres and that serves an urban area with a population that is greater than 750,000 in northern California.

(c) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) of the funds available pursuant to this section shall be allocated to the County of Los Angeles for the El Pueblo Cultural and Performing Arts Center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Fiscal Provisions [5096.665. - 5096.683.]

5096.665.

Bonds in the total amount of two billion six hundred million dollars ($2,600,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 5096.677, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes set forth in Section 5096.610 and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable. Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act Finance Committee created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.667 at any different times that are necessary to service expenditures appropriated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.666.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter by this reference as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.667.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Secretary of the Resources Agency is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.668.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter to carry out Section 5096.610 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.670.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds maturing each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.671.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 5096.672, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.672.

For purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amount withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.673.

Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the cost of bond issuance shall be paid out of the bond proceeds. These costs shall be shared proportionally by each program funded through this bond act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.674.

Actual costs incurred in connection with administering programs authorized under the categories specified in Section 5096.610 shall be paid from the funds authorized by this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.675.

The secretary may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, including other authorized forms of interim financing that include, but are not limited to, commercial paper, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The secretary shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.676.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.677.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state of the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.678.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.679.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(b) Funds provided pursuant to this chapter, and any appropriation or transfer of those funds, shall not be deemed to be a transfer of funds for the purposes of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2780) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.681.

Except for funds continuously appropriated by this chapter, all appropriations of funds pursuant to Section 5096.610 for purposes of the program shall be included in the Budget Bill for the 2002–03 fiscal year, and each succeeding fiscal year, for consideration by the Legislature, and shall bear the label “California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Program Fund.” The Budget Bill section shall contain separate items for each project, each class of project, or each element of the program for which an appropriation is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.683.

The Secretary shall provide for an annual audit of expenditures from this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.697. Efficient Water Use in Parks and Recreation Areas Act [5096.687. - 5096.689.]

5096.687.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Efficient Water Use in Parks and Recreation Areas Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   Effective September 3, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.688.

It is the intent of the Legislature to promote the conservation and efficient use of water in California’s parks and recreational areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   Effective September 3, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.689.

Criteria and procedures adopted by the department for evaluating applications for grants made available pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 5096.620 for the development of neighborhood, community, and regional parks and recreation lands and facilities in urban and rural areas shall include recommendations that grant applicants consider the implementation or installation of water conservation measures as part of their proposed project. The department shall develop those recommendations in consultation with the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   Effective September 3, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.699. Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Act of 2006 [5096.800. - 5096.968.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5096.800. - 5096.800.]

5096.800.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Act of 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [5096.805. - 5096.805.]

5096.805.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Board” means the Reclamation Board or successor entity.

(b) “Committee” means the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Finance Committee, created by Section 5096.957.

(c) “Delta” means the area of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta as defined in Section 12220 of the Water Code.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(e) “Facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control” means the levees, weirs, channels, and other features of the federally and state-authorized flood control facilities located in the Sacramento River and San Joaquin River drainage basin for which the board or the department has given the assurances of nonfederal cooperation to the United States required for the project, and those facilities identified in Section 8361 of the Water Code.

(f) “Fund” means the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Fund of 2006, created by Section 5096.806.

(g) “Project levees” means the levees that are part of the facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(h) “Restoration” means the improvement of a physical structure or facility and, in the case of natural system and landscape features, includes, but is not limited to, a project for the control of erosion, the control and elimination of exotic species, including prescribed burning, fuel hazard reduction, fencing out threats to existing or restored natural resources, road elimination, and other plant and wildlife habitat improvement to increase the natural system value of the property. A restoration project shall include the planning, monitoring, and reporting necessary to ensure successful implementation of the project objectives.

(i) “State General Obligation Bond Law” means the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(j) “State Plan of Flood Control” means the state and federal flood control works, lands, programs, plans, conditions, and mode of maintenance and operations of the Sacramento River Flood Control Project described in Section 8350 of the Water Code, and of flood control projects in the Sacramento River and San Joaquin River watersheds authorized pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12648) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code for which the board or the department has provided the assurances of nonfederal cooperation to the United States, which shall be updated by the department and compiled into a single document entitled “The State Plan of Flood Control.”

(k) “Urban area” means any contiguous area in which more than 10,000 residents are protected by project levees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, and approved in Prop. 1E on Nov. 7, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Fund of 2006 [5096.806. - 5096.806.]

5096.806.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Fund of 2006, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Program [5096.820. - 5096.830.]

5096.820.

(a) The sum of four billion ninety million dollars ($4,090,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation therefor, for disaster preparedness and flood prevention projects pursuant to this article.

(b) In expending funds pursuant to this article, the Governor shall do all of the following:

(1) Secure the maximum feasible amounts of federal and local matching funds to fund disaster preparedness and flood prevention projects in order to ensure prudent and cost-effective use of these funds to the extent that this does not prohibit timely implementation of this article.

(2) Prioritize project selection and project design to achieve maximum public benefits from the use of these funds.

(3) In connection with the submission of the annual Governor’s Budget, submit an annual Bond Expenditure Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Plan that describes in detail the proposed expenditures of bond funds, the amount of federal appropriations and local funding obtained to fund disaster preparedness and flood prevention projects to match those expenditures, and an investment strategy to meet long-term flood protection needs and minimize state taxpayer liabilities from flooding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.821.

Three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation to the department, for the following purposes:

(a) The evaluation, repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction, or replacement of levees, weirs, bypasses, and facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control by all of the following actions:

(1) Repairing erosion sites and removing sediment from channels or bypasses.

(2) Evaluating and repairing levees and any other facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(3) Implementing mitigation measures for a project undertaken pursuant to this subdivision. The department may fund participation in a natural community conservation plan pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code to facilitate projects authorized by this subdivision.

(b) Improving or adding facilities to the State Plan of Flood Control to increase levels of flood prevention for urban areas, including all related costs for mitigation and infrastructure relocation. Funds made available by this subdivision may be expended for state financial participation in federal and state authorized flood control projects, feasibility studies and design of federal flood damage reduction and related projects, and reservoir reoperation and groundwater flood storage projects. Not more than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) may be expended on a single project, excluding authorized flood control improvements to Folsom Dam.

(c) (1) To reduce the risk of levee failure in the delta.

(2) The funds made available for the purpose specified in paragraph (1) shall be expended for both of the following purposes:

(A) Local assistance under the delta levee maintenance subventions program under Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980) of Division 6 of the Water Code, as that part may be amended.
